Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1002.
do enact as follows:AB1002,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB1002,26Section 2. 20.435 (7) (f) of the statutes is created to read:AB1002,2,9720.435 (7) (f) Economic support specialist grants. As a continuing 8appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for grants to fund economic support 9specialist positions in resource centers, as defined in s. 46.2805 (10).AB1002,310Section 3. 20.435 (7) (f) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 11(this act), is repealed.AB1002,412Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.AB1002,2,1313(1) Reconciliation provision.AB1002,2,1714(a) If 2025 Assembly Bill 973, or any other 2025 bill whose content is identical 15to the content of 2025 Assembly Bill 973, is enacted into law, then this act takes 16effect on the effective date of the first of those bills that is enacted into law or on the 17effective date of this paragraph, whichever is later.AB1002,2,1818(b) If par. (a) does not apply, then this act is void.AB1002,519Section 5. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 20publication, except as follows:AB1002,2,2121(1) The repeal of s. 20.435 (7) (f) takes effect on July 1, 2027.AB1002,2,2222